California statutes. Vehicle Code
(C) A person operating or in charge of a storage facility described in subparagraph (B) who violates subparagraph (B) shall be civilly liable to the owner of the vehicle or to the person who tendered the fees for four times the amount of the towing, storage, and related fees, but not to exceed five hundred dollars ($500).

(D) A person operating or in charge of a storage facility described in subparagraph (B) shall have sufficient funds on the premises of the primary storage facility during normal business hours to accommodate, and make change in, a reasonable monetary transaction.

(E) Credit charges for towing and storage services shall comply with Section 1748.1 of the Civil Code. Law enforcement agencies may include the costs of providing for payment by credit when
 making agreements with towing companies on rates.

(3) (A) The legal owner or the legal owner’s agent presents to the law enforcement agency or impounding agency, or any person acting on behalf of those agencies, a copy of the assignment, as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 7500.1 of the Business and Professions Code; a release from the one responsible governmental agency, only if required by the agency; a government-issued photographic identification card; and any one of the following as determined by the legal owner or the legal owner’s agent: a certificate of repossession for the vehicle, a security agreement for the vehicle, or title, whether paper or electronic, showing proof of legal ownership for the vehicle. The law enforcement agency, impounding agency, or any other governmental agency, or any person acting on behalf of those agencies, shall not require the presentation of any other documents.

(B) The legal owner or the legal owner’s agent presents to the person in possession of the vehicle, or any person acting on behalf of the person in possession, a copy of the assignment, as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 7500.1 of the Business and Professions Code; a release from the one responsible governmental agency, only if required by the agency; a government-issued photographic identification card; and any one of the following as determined by the legal owner or the legal owner’s agent: a certificate of repossession for the vehicle, a security agreement for the vehicle, or title, whether paper or electronic, showing proof of legal ownership for the vehicle. The person in possession of the vehicle, or any person acting on behalf of the person in possession, shall not require the presentation of any other documents.

(C) All presented documents may be originals, photocopies,
 or facsimile copies, or may be transmitted electronically. The law enforcement agency, impounding agency, or any person in possession of the vehicle, or anyone acting on behalf of them, shall not require any documents to be notarized. The law enforcement agency, impounding agency, or any person acting on behalf of those agencies, may require the agent of the legal owner to produce a photocopy or facsimile copy of its repossession agency license or registration issued pursuant to Chapter 11 (commencing with Section 7500) of Division 3 of the Business and Professions Code, or to demonstrate, to the satisfaction of the law enforcement agency, impounding agency, or any person in possession of the vehicle, or anyone acting on behalf of them, that the agent is exempt from licensure pursuant to Section 7500.2 or 7500.3 of the Business and Professions Code.

(D) An administrative cost authorized under subdivision (a) of Section 22850.5 shall not be
 charged to the legal owner of the type specified in paragraph (1) who redeems the vehicle unless the legal owner voluntarily requests a poststorage hearing. A city, county, city and county, or state agency shall not require a legal owner or a legal owner’s agent to request a poststorage hearing as a requirement for release of the vehicle to the legal owner or the legal owner’s agent. The law enforcement agency, impounding agency, or any other governmental agency, or any person acting on behalf of those agencies, shall not require any documents other than those specified in this paragraph. The law enforcement agency, impounding agency, or other governmental agency, or any person acting on behalf of those agencies, may not require any documents to be notarized. The legal owner or the legal owner’s agent shall be given a copy of any documents he or she is required to sign, except for a vehicle evidentiary hold logbook. The law enforcement agency, impounding agency, or any person acting on behalf of those
 agencies, or any person in possession of the vehicle, may photocopy and retain the copies of any documents presented by the legal owner or legal owner’s agent.

(4) A failure by a storage facility to comply with any applicable conditions set forth in this subdivision shall not affect the right of the legal owner or the legal owner’s agent to retrieve the vehicle, provided all conditions required of the legal owner or legal owner’s agent under this subdivision are satisfied.

(f) (1) A legal owner or the legal owner’s agent that obtains release of the vehicle pursuant to subdivision (e) shall not release the vehicle to the registered owner of the vehicle or the person who was listed as the registered owner when the vehicle was impounded or any agents of the registered owner until the termination of the impoundment period.

(2) The legal owner or the legal owner’s agent shall not relinquish the vehicle to the registered owner or the person who was listed as the registered owner when the vehicle was impounded until the registered owner or that owner’s agent presents his or her valid driver’s license or valid temporary driver’s license, and an operator’s license that is in compliance with the licensing requirements adopted by the local authority under subdivision (b) of Section 21100, to the legal owner or the legal owner’s agent. The legal owner or the legal owner’s agent or the person in possession of the vehicle shall make every reasonable effort to ensure that the licenses presented are valid and possession of the vehicle will not be given to the driver who was involved in the original impoundment proceeding until the expiration of the impoundment period.

(3) Prior to relinquishing the vehicle, the
 legal owner may require the registered owner to pay all towing and storage charges related to the impoundment and the administrative charges authorized under Section 22850.5 that were incurred by the legal owner in connection with obtaining the custody of the vehicle.

(4) Any legal owner who knowingly releases or causes the release of a vehicle to a registered owner or the person in possession of the vehicle at the time of the impoundment or any agent of the registered owner in violation of this subdivision shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and subject to a civil penalty in the amount of two thousand dollars ($2,000).

(5) The legal owner, registered owner, or person in possession of the vehicle shall not change or attempt to change the name of the legal owner or the registered owner on the records of the department until the vehicle is released from the impoundment.

(g) Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, the registered owner and not the legal owner shall remain responsible for any towing and storage charges related to the impoundment and the administrative charges authorized under Section 22850.5 and any parking fines, penalties, and administrative fees incurred by the registered owner.

(h) The law enforcement agency and the impounding agency, including any storage facility acting on behalf of the law enforcement agency or impounding agency, shall comply with this section and shall not be liable to the registered owner for the improper release of the vehicle to the legal owner or the legal owner’s agent if the release complies with this section. The legal owner shall indemnify and hold harmless a storage facility from any claims arising out of the release of the vehicle to the legal owner or the legal owner’s agent and from any
 damage to the vehicle after its release, including the reasonable costs associated with defending any such claims. A law enforcement agency shall not refuse to issue a release to a legal owner or the agent of a legal owner on the grounds that it previously issued a release.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 536, Sec. 14.   (AB 957)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

21100.5.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of law, local authorities of any city which is on a natural island with an area in excess of 20,000 acres and which is within a county having a population in excess of 4,000,000, may, if they determine such rules and regulations to be necessary in view of the special problem existing thereon with respect to the size and nature of the streets of the city and with respect to the characteristics and nature of the city itself, adopt rules and regulations by ordinance or resolution on the following matters:

(a) Regulating the size of vehicles used on streets under their jurisdiction. 

(b) Regulating the number of vehicles permitted on streets under their jurisdiction.

(c) Prohibiting the operation, on streets under their jurisdiction, of designated classes of vehicles.

(d) Establishing noise limits, which are different from those prescribed by this code, for vehicles operated on streets under their jurisdiction and prohibiting the operation of vehicles which exceed such limits.

(e) Establishing a maximum speed limit lower than that which the local authority otherwise permitted by this code to establish.

This section shall not apply to vehicles of utilities which are under the jurisdiction of the Public Utilities Commission while engaged in maintenance and construction type service work.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1974, Ch. 286.)
-------------------------------------------

21100.6.

(a) The Counties of Alameda, Contra Costa, and Solano may create a three-year pilot program to regulate the transport of solid waste by commercial nonfranchise solid waste haulers on public roads in unincorporated areas of the county and may adopt an ordinance, as described in subdivision (b),
 as part of the pilot program.

(b) An ordinance adopted pursuant to this section may include, but is not limited to, provisions requiring commercial nonfranchise solid waste haulers to do any or all of the following:

(1) Obtain a permit to transport solid waste on public roads in unincorporated areas.

(2) Display evidence of the permit described in paragraph (1) when transporting solid waste.

(3) Notwithstanding Section 9400.8, pay a fee to cover the county’s reasonable regulatory cost of enforcing the ordinance.

(c) This section does not grant a county any new authority over solid waste hauling operations pursuant to a franchise agreement and does not affect, limit, or abrogate in any manner any franchise granted to a solid waste enterprise for the handling of solid waste.

(d) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:”

(1) “Commercial nonfranchise solid waste hauler” means an entity that charges a fee to haul and dispose of solid waste that is not part of any exclusive or
 nonexclusive franchise contract or agreement.

(2) “Solid waste” has the same meaning as defined in Section 40191 of the Public Resources Code.

(e) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2028, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 202, Sec. 1.   (AB 592)   Effective January 1, 2024.   Repealed as of January 1, 2028, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

21101.

Local authorities, for those highways under their jurisdiction, may adopt rules and regulations by ordinance or resolution, except as provided in subdivision (f), on the following matters:

(a) Closing any highway to vehicular traffic when, in the opinion of the legislative body having jurisdiction, the highway is either of the following:

(1) No longer needed for vehicular traffic.

(2) The closure is in the interests of public safety and all of the following conditions and requirements are met:

(A) The street proposed
 for closure is located in a county with a population of 6,000,000 or more.

(B) The street has an unsafe volume of traffic and a significant incidence of crime.

(C) The affected local authority conducts a public hearing on the proposed street closure.

(D) Notice of the hearing is provided to residents and owners of property adjacent to the street proposed for closure.

(E) The local authority makes a finding that closure of the street likely would result in a reduced rate of crime.

(b) Designating any highway as a through highway and requiring that all vehicles observe official traffic control
 devices before entering or crossing the highway or designating any intersection as a stop intersection and requiring all vehicles to stop at one or more entrances to the intersection.

(c) Prohibiting the use of particular highways by certain vehicles, except as otherwise provided by the Public Utilities Commission pursuant to Article 2 (commencing with Section 1031) of Chapter 5 of Part 1 of Division 1 of the Public Utilities Code.

(d) Closing particular streets during regular school hours for the purpose of conducting automobile driver training programs in the secondary schools and colleges of this state.

(e) Temporarily closing a portion of any street for celebrations, parades, local special events, and other purposes when,
 in the opinion of local authorities having jurisdiction or a public officer or employee that the local authority designates by resolution, the closing is necessary for the safety and protection of persons who are to use that portion of the street during the temporary closing.

(f) Implementing a slow streets program. For purposes of this section, a “slow streets program” may include closures to vehicular traffic or through vehicular traffic of neighborhood local streets with connections to citywide bicycle networks, destinations, such as a business district, that are within walking distance, or green space. A local authority may implement a slow streets program by adopting an ordinance that provides for the closing of streets to vehicular traffic or limiting access and speed on a street using roadway design features, including, but not limited
 to, islands, curbs, or traffic barriers. A local authority may implement a slow streets program if it meets all of the following requirements:

(1) Conducts an outreach and engagement process that includes notification to residents and owners of property abutting any street being considered for inclusion in the slow streets program.

(2) Determines that the closure or traffic restriction leaves a sufficient portion of the streets in the surrounding area for other public uses, including vehicular, pedestrian, and bicycle traffic.

(3) Provides advance notice of the closure or traffic restriction to residents and owners of property abutting the street.

(4) Clearly
 designates the street closure or traffic restriction with signage in compliance with the California Manual on Uniform Traffic Control Devices.

(5) Determines that the closure or traffic restriction is necessary for the safety and protection of persons who are to use that portion of the street during the closure or traffic restriction.

(6) Maintains a publically available internet website with information about its slow streets program, a list of streets that are included in the program or are being evaluated for inclusion in the program, and instructions for participating in the public engagement process.

(g) Prohibiting entry to, or exit from, or both, from any street by means of islands, curbs, traffic barriers, or other roadway
 design features to implement the circulation element of a general plan adopted pursuant to Article 6 (commencing with Section 65350) of Chapter 3 of Division 1 of Title 7 of the Government Code. The rules and regulations authorized by this subdivision shall be consistent with the responsibility of local government to provide for the health and safety of its citizens.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 28, Sec. 154.   (SB 1380)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

21101.2.

Local authorities may adopt rules and regulations by ordinance or resolution to provide that if a peace officer, as defined in Chapter 4.5 (commencing with Section 830) of Title 3 of Part 2 of the Penal Code, determines that the traffic load on a particular street or highway, or a portion thereof, is such that little or no vehicular flow is occurring and, additionally, if the peace officer finds that a significant number of vehicles are not promptly moving when an opportunity arises to do so, then the peace officer may divert vehicles, excepting public safety or emergency vehicles, from that street or highway, or portion thereof, subject to traffic congestion until such time as reasonably flowing traffic is restored.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 710, Sec. 3.   Effective September 8, 1982.)
-------------------------------------------

21101.4.

(a) A local authority may, by ordinance or resolution, adopt rules and regulations for temporarily closing to through traffic a highway under its jurisdiction when all of the following conditions are, after a public hearing, found to exist:

(1) The local authority finds and determines that, based upon the recommendation of the police department or, in the case of a highway in an unincorporated area, on the joint recommendation of the sheriff’s department and the Department of the California Highway Patrol, one of the following concerns exists along the portion of highway recommended for closure:

(A) Serious and continual criminal activity.

(B) Serious and continual illegal dumping.

(2) The highway is not designated as a through highway or arterial street, or, if the highway is so designated, the local authority, in conjunction with law enforcement and traffic engineers, has determined that a temporary closure may be accomplished without significant impact on the normal flow of traffic.

(3) Vehicular or pedestrian traffic on the highway contributes to the concern described in paragraph (1).

(4) The closure will not substantially adversely affect traffic flow, safety on the adjacent streets or in the surrounding neighborhoods, the operation of emergency vehicles, the performance of municipal or public utility services, or the delivery of freight by commercial vehicles in the area of the
 highway proposed to be temporarily closed.

(b) A highway may be temporarily closed pursuant to subdivision (a) for not more than 18 months, except that this period may be extended for not more than eight additional consecutive periods of not more than 18 months each if, prior to each of those extensions, the local authority holds a public hearing and finds, by ordinance or resolution, that all of the following conditions exist:

(1) Continuation of the temporary closure will assist in preventing the occurrence or reoccurrence of the concern described in paragraph (1), found to exist when the immediately preceding temporary closure was authorized. This finding and determination shall be based upon the recommendation of the police department or, in the case of a highway in an unincorporated area, on the joint recommendation of the sheriff’s department and the Department of the
 California Highway Patrol.

(2) The highway is not designated as a through highway or arterial street, or, if the highway is so designated, the local authority, in conjunction with law enforcement and traffic engineers, has determined that the immediately preceding temporary closure has been accomplished without significant impact on the normal flow of traffic.

(3) Vehicular or pedestrian traffic on the highway contributes to the concern described in paragraph (1).

(4) The immediately preceding closure has not substantially adversely affected traffic flow, safety on the adjacent streets or in the surrounding neighborhoods, the operation of emergency vehicles, the performance of municipal or public utility services, or the delivery of freight by commercial vehicles in the area of the highway that was temporarily
 closed.

(c) The local authority shall mail written notice of the public hearing required under subdivision (a) or (b) to all residents and owners, as shown on the last equalized assessment roll, of property adjacent to the portion of highway where a temporary closure or extension of temporary closure is proposed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 34, Sec. 1.   (AB 332)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

21101.6.

Notwithstanding Section 21101, local authorities may not place gates or other selective devices on any street which deny or restrict the access of certain members of the public to the street, while permitting others unrestricted access to the street.

This section is not intended to make a change in the existing law, but is intended to codify the decision of the Court of Appeal in City of Lafayette v. County of Contra Costa (91 Cal. App. 3d 749).

This section shall become operative on January 1, 1990.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 2) and added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 689, Sec. 3.   Section operative January 1, 1990, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

21102.

Local authorities may adopt rules and regulations by ordinance or resolution closing to vehicular traffic that portion of any street or highway crossing or dividing any school ground or grounds when in the opinion of the legislative body having jurisdiction such closing is necessary for the protection of persons attending such school or school grounds. The closing to vehicular traffic may be limited to such hours and days as the legislative body may specify. No such ordinance or resolution shall be effective until appropriate signs giving notice thereof are posted along the street or highway affected, nor in the case of state highways, until such ordinance or resolution is approved by the Department of Transportation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1974, Ch. 545.)
-------------------------------------------

21102.1.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, local authorities may, by ordinance or resolution, adopt rules and regulations restricting vehicular or pedestrian traffic through any alley by means of gates, barriers, or other control devices, when, in the opinion of the local authority having jurisdiction over the alley, the restriction is necessary for the protection or preservation of the public peace, safety, health, or welfare, subject to the following conditions:

(a) No ordinance or resolution adopted pursuant to this section shall be enforceable until appropriate signs giving notice of the restriction are posted at every entrance to the alley.

(b) In the coastal zone, as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 30103 of the Public Resources Code, where the alley provides direct access to any public beach or state waters, the local authority shall comply with Division 20 (commencing with Section 30000) of the Public Resources Code.

(c) In the area administered by the San Francisco Bay Conservation and Development Commission, where the alley provides direct access to any public beach, state waters, or wetlands, the local authority shall first obtain the concurrence by, or on behalf of, the San Francisco Bay Conservation and Development Commission. The concurrence or objection shall be based on the permits issued by the San Francisco Bay Conservation and Development Commission and in conformance with the policies contained in Title 7.2 (commencing with Section 66600) of the Government Code and Division 19 (commencing with Section 29000) of the Public Resources Code.

(d) The local authority shall provide access to utility vehicular or pedestrian traffic in order that the utility may maintain, operate, replace, remove, or renew existing and functioning utility facilities.

(e) No ordinance or resolution adopted pursuant to this section shall prohibit the delivery of freight by commercial vehicles.

(f) No ordinance or resolution adopted pursuant to this section shall be implemented in a manner that adversely affects the operation of emergency vehicles or the performance of municipal services.

(g) No ordinance or resolution adopted pursuant to this section shall restrict the access of certain members of the public to the alley, while permitting others unrestricted access to the alley.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 215, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

21103.

No ordinance or resolution enacted under Section 21101 shall be effective until signs giving notice of the local traffic laws are posted at all entrances to the highway or part thereof affected.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 671, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

21104.

No ordinance or resolution proposed to be enacted under Section 21101 or subdivision (d) of Section 21100 is effective as to any highway not under the exclusive jurisdiction of the local authority enacting the same, except that an ordinance or resolution which is submitted to the Department of Transportation by a local legislative body in complete draft form for approval prior to the enactment thereof is effective as to any state highway or part thereof specified in the written approval of the department.

This section does not preclude the application of an ordinance or resolution adopted under Section 21101 or subdivision (d) of Section 21100 to streets maintained by a community services district organized pursuant to Division 3 (commencing with Section 61000) of Title 6 of the Government Code. An ordinance or resolution enacted by a local authority pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 21101 may impose a fine or penalty of up to one hundred dollars ($100) for a violation of this code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 177, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

21105.

No rule or regulation adopted under Sections 21100 or 21101 shall be effective as to boundary line streets where portions thereof are within different jurisdictions unless all authorities having jurisdiction of such portions of the street concerned have approved the same.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1959, Ch. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

21106.

(a) Local authorities, by ordinance or resolution, may establish crosswalks between intersections.

(b) Local authorities may install signs at or adjacent to an intersection directing that pedestrians shall not cross in a crosswalk indicated at the intersection. It is unlawful for any pedestrian to cross at the crosswalk prohibited by a sign.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1959, Ch. 417.)
-------------------------------------------

21107.

The provisions of this code shall not prevent any city from adopting rules and regulations by ordinance or resolution, regulating vehicular traffic on privately owned and maintained roads located within the boundary of such city, except that no such ordinance or resolution shall be effective until signs giving notice thereof are posted on the roads affected. The provisions of this section shall not apply to any city in which there are publicly maintained city streets.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1959, Ch. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

21107.5.

(a) Any city or county may, by ordinance or resolution, find and declare that there are privately owned and maintained roads as described in the ordinance or resolution within the city or county that are generally held open for use by the public for vehicular travel and which so connect with highways that the public cannot determine that the roads are not highways. Upon enactment by a city or county of the ordinance or resolution, this code shall apply to the privately owned and maintained road, except as provided in subdivision (b).

(b) No ordinance or resolution enacted under subdivision (a) shall apply to any road on which the owner has erected a notice of a size, shape, and color as to be readily legible during daylight hours from a distance of 100 feet to the effect that the road is privately owned and maintained and that it is not subject to public traffic regulations or control.

(c) No ordinance or resolution shall be enacted under subdivision (a) without a public hearing after 10 days’ written notice to the owner of the privately owned and maintained road involved.

(d) The department is not required to provide patrol or enforce any provision of this code on any privately owned and maintained road, except those provisions applicable to private property, other than pursuant to this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 160, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

21107.6.

(a) Any city or county may, by ordinance, find and declare that there are privately owned and maintained roads as described in such ordinance within the city or county which are generally held open to the public for purposes of vehicular travel to serve commercial establishments. Upon enactment by a city or county of such an ordinance, the provisions of this code shall apply to any such privately owned and maintained road. No ordinance shall be enacted under this section without a public hearing thereon and 10 days’ prior notice to the owner of the privately owned and maintained road involved.

(b) Notwithstanding the provisions of subdivision (a) no ordinance enacted thereunder shall apply to any road described therein on which the owner has caused to be erected a notice of such size, shape and color as to be readily legible during daylight hours from a distance of 100 feet, to the effect that the road is privately owned and maintained and that it is not subject to public traffic regulations or control.

(c) The department shall not be required to provide patrol or enforce any provisions of this code on any privately owned and maintained road subjected to the provisions of this code under this section, except those provisions applicable to private property other than by action under this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 514.)
-------------------------------------------

21107.7.

(a) Any city or county may, by ordinance or resolution, find and declare that there are privately owned and maintained roads as described in the ordinance or resolution within the city or county that are not generally held open for use of the public for purposes of vehicular travel but, by reason of their proximity to or connection with highways, the interests of any residents residing along the roads and the motoring public will best be served by application of the provisions of this code to those roads. No ordinance or resolution shall be enacted unless there is first filed with the city or county a petition requesting it by a majority of the owners of any privately owned and maintained road, or by at least a majority of the board of directors of a common interest development, as
 defined by Section 4100 or 6534 of the Civil Code, that is responsible for maintaining the road, and without a public hearing thereon and 10 days’ prior written notice to all owners of the road or all of the owners in the development. Upon enactment of the ordinance or resolution, the provisions of this code shall apply to the privately owned and maintained road if appropriate signs are erected at the entrance to the road of the size, shape, and color as to be readily legible during daylight hours from a distance of 100 feet, to the effect that the road is subject to the provisions of this code. The city or county may impose reasonable conditions and may authorize the owners, or board of directors of the common interest development, to erect traffic signs, signals, markings, and devices which conform to the uniform standards and specifications adopted by the Department of Transportation.

(b) The department shall not be required to provide
 patrol or enforce any provisions of this code on any privately owned and maintained road subjected to the provisions of this code under this section, except those provisions applicable to private property other than by action under this section.

(c) As used in this section, “privately owned and maintained roads” includes roads owned and maintained by a city, county, or district that are not dedicated to use by the public or are not generally held open for use of the public for purposes of vehicular travel.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 181, Sec. 80) by Stats. 2013, Ch. 605, Sec. 49.   (SB 752)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

21107.8.

(a) (1) A city, county, or city and county may, by ordinance or resolution, find and declare that there are privately owned and maintained offstreet parking facilities as described in the ordinance or resolution within the city, county, or city and county that are generally held open for use of the public for purposes of vehicular parking. Upon enactment by a city, county, or city and county of the ordinance or resolution, Sections 22350, 23103, and 23109 and the provisions of Division 16.5 (commencing with Section 38000) shall apply to privately owned and maintained offstreet parking facilities, except as provided in subdivision (b).

(2) (A) If a city, county, or city and county enacts an ordinance or resolution authorized by paragraph (1), the city, county, or city and county may include in that ordinance or resolution authorization for the operator of a privately owned and maintained offstreet parking facility to regulate unauthorized parking in that facility.

(B) (i) If a city, county, or city and county has exercised its authority pursuant to subparagraph (A) and unauthorized parking is regulated in a privately owned and maintained offstreet parking facility, the owner or operator of that facility shall include in a parking fee invoice instructions that describe the manner in which to contest the parking fee invoice.

(ii) If a city, county, or city and county has exercised its authority
 pursuant to subparagraph (A) and unauthorized parking is regulated in a privately owned and maintained offstreet parking facility, the owner or operator of that facility shall not file with, or transmit to, the Department of Motor Vehicles a parking fee invoice for the purpose of having the Department of Motor Vehicles attempt to collect unpaid parking fees by refusing to renew the registration of a vehicle pursuant to Section 4760.

(b) (1) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), an ordinance or resolution enacted pursuant to that subdivision does not apply to an offstreet parking facility unless the owner or operator has caused to be posted in a conspicuous place at each entrance to that offstreet parking facility a notice not less than 17 by 22 inches in size with lettering not less than one inch in height, to the effect that the offstreet
 parking facility is subject to public moving vehicle laws and violators may be subject to a parking invoice fee.

(2) If applicable, a parking receipt distributed to drivers shall include language explicitly stating that violators may be subject to a parking invoice fee.

(c) An ordinance or resolution shall not be enacted pursuant to subdivision (a) without a public hearing on the matter and 10 days prior written notice to the owner and operator of the privately owned and maintained offstreet parking facility involved.

(d) Section 22507.8 may be enforced without enactment of an ordinance or resolution as required pursuant to subdivision (a) or the posting of a notice at each entrance to the offstreet parking facility as
 required by paragraph (1) of subdivision (b).

(e) The department shall not be required to provide patrol or to enforce any provision of this code in a privately owned and maintained offstreet parking facility subject to this section except those provisions applicable to private property actions not described in this section.

(f) A city, county, or city and county that authorizes private parking regulation pursuant to this section shall, in its ordinance or resolution, include provisions that include all of the following:

(1) Procedures for dispute resolution in accordance with Section 40215, including all of the following:

(A) A written and publicly available
 dispute resolution policy that includes specified time periods for notifications, review, and appeal.

(B) An administrative hearing process that includes all of the following:

(i) Options for a hearing in person or by mail.

(ii) Administrative review.

(iii) A hearing by a third-party examiner who has been adequately trained and who provides an independent, objective, fair, and impartial review.

(iv) Personal delivery or delivery by first-class mail of the examiner’s decision.

(v) Authority for the examiner to allow payment of the parking
 invoice fee in installments for persons showing evidence of inability to pay the parking invoice fee in full.

(2) A prohibition against incentives based on the number of invoices issued or the number or percentage of disputed invoices adjudicated that uphold parking invoice fees.

(3) A cap on a parking invoice fee that is commensurate with the most nearly equivalent municipal parking fine.

(4) Measures to prevent a private parking regulator from representing itself as a government enforcement agency, including a prohibition against the use of terminology in ordinances, resolutions, and parking fee invoices that is restricted to governmental law enforcement and a requirement that a conspicuous statement be included
 on parking fee invoices to the effect that “This parking invoice fee notice is not issued by the [local government].”

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 741, Sec. 4.   (AB 503)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

21107.9.

(a) Any city or county, or city and county, may, by ordinance or resolution, find and declare that there are privately owned and maintained roads within a mobilehome park, as defined in Section 18214 of the Health and Safety Code, or within a manufactured housing community, as defined in Section 18801 of the Health and Safety Code, within the city or county, or city and county, that are generally not held open for use by the public for vehicular travel. Upon enactment of the ordinance or resolution, the provisions of this code shall apply to the privately owned and maintained roads within a mobilehome park or manufactured housing community if appropriate signs are erected at the entrance or entrances to the mobilehome park or manufactured housing community of the size, shape, and color as to be readily legible during daylight hours from a distance of 100 feet, to the effect that the roads within the park or community are subject to the provisions of this code. The city or county, or city and county, may impose reasonable conditions and may authorize the owners of the mobilehome park or manufactured housing community to erect traffic signs, markings, or devices which conform to the uniform standards and specifications adopted by the Department of Transportation.

(b) No ordinance or resolution shall be enacted unless there is first filed with the city or county a petition requested by the owner or owners of any privately owned and maintained roads within a mobilehome park or manufactured housing community, who are responsible for maintaining the roads.
